Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,128
Authorized distributions.

(a) A mutual benefit corporation may purchase its memberships if after the purchase is completed:

(1) The corporation would be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its activities; and

(2) The corporation's total assets would at least equal the sum of its total liabilities.

(b) Corporations may make distributions upon dissolution in conformity with sections 21-19,129 to 21-19,145.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 128.